Illinois, session 104th, SB2239.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Sections 4-50, 5-50, 6-100, 18A-5, and 18A-15 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/4-50)7    Sec. 4-50. Grace period. Notwithstanding any other 8provision of this Code to the contrary, each election 9authority shall establish procedures for the registration of 10voters and for change of address during the period from the 11close of registration for an election until and including the 12day of the election. During this grace period, an unregistered 13qualified elector may register to vote, and a registered voter 14may submit a change of address form, in person in the office of 15the election authority, at a permanent polling place 16established under Section 19A-10, at any other early voting 17site beginning 15 days prior to the election, at a polling 18place on election day, or at a voter registration location 19specifically designated for this purpose by the election 20authority. Grace period registration and changes of address 21shall also be conducted for eligible residents in connection 22with voting at facilities under Section 19-12.2 of this Code. 23The election authority shall register that individual, or   SB2239- 2 -LRB104 09172 SPS 19228 b1change a registered voter's address, in the same manner as 2otherwise provided by this Article for registration and change 3of address.4    If a voter who registers or changes address during this 5grace period wishes to vote at the election or primary 6occurring during the grace period, he or she must do so by 7grace period voting. The election authority shall offer 8in-person grace period voting at the authority's office, any 9permanent polling place established under Section 19A-10, and 10at any other early voting site beginning 15 days prior to the 11election, at a polling place on election day, where grace 12period registration is required by this Section; and may offer 13in-person grace period voting at additional hours and 14locations specifically designated for the purpose of grace 15period voting by the election authority. The election 16authority may allow grace period voting by mail only if the 17election authority has no ballots prepared at the authority's 18office. Grace period voting shall be in a manner substantially 19similar to voting under Article 19A. 20    Within one day after a voter casts a grace period ballot, 21or within one day after the ballot is received by the election 22authority if the election authority allows grace period voting 23by mail, the election authority shall transmit by electronic 24means pursuant to a process established by the State Board of 25Elections the voter's name, street address, e-mail address, 26and precinct, ward, township, and district numbers, as the   SB2239- 3 -LRB104 09172 SPS 19228 b1case may be, to the State Board of Elections, which shall 2maintain those names and that information in an electronic 3format on its website, arranged by county and accessible to 4State and local political committees. The name of each person 5issued a grace period ballot shall also be placed on the 6appropriate precinct list of persons to whom vote by mail and 7early ballots have been issued, for use as provided in 8Sections 17-9 and 18-5.9    A person who casts a grace period ballot shall not be 10permitted to revoke that ballot and vote another ballot with 11respect to that primary or election. Ballots cast by persons 12who register or change address during the grace period at a 13location other than their designated polling place on election 14day must be transmitted to and counted at the election 15authority's central ballot counting location and shall not be 16transmitted to and counted at precinct polling places. The 17grace period ballots determined to be valid shall be added to 18the vote totals for the precincts for which they were cast in 19the order in which the ballots were opened.20    If a person registers to vote on the day of the election 21under this Section, the election authority shall only allow 22that person to vote a provisional ballot as described in 23Section 18A-5.24    In counties with a population of less than 100,000 that do 25not have electronic poll books, the election authority may opt 26out of registration in the polling place if the election   SB2239- 4 -LRB104 09172 SPS 19228 b1authority establishes grace period registration and voting at 2other sites on election day at the following sites: (i) the 3election authority's main office and (ii) a polling place in 4each municipality where 20% or more of the county's residents 5reside if the election authority's main office is not located 6in that municipality. The election authority may establish 7other grace period registration and voting sites on election 8day provided that the election authority has met the notice 9requirements of Section 19A-25 for permanent and temporary 10early voting sites. 11(Source: P.A. 100-442, eff. 8-25-17.) 12    (10 ILCS 5/5-50)13    Sec. 5-50. Grace period. Notwithstanding any other 14provision of this Code to the contrary, each election 15authority shall establish procedures for the registration of 16voters and for change of address during the period from the 17close of registration for an election until and including the 18day of the election. During this grace period, an unregistered 19qualified elector may register to vote, and a registered voter 20may submit a change of address form, in person in the office of 21the election authority, at a permanent polling place 22established under Section 19A-10, at any other early voting 23site beginning 15 days prior to the election, at a polling 24place on election day, or at a voter registration location 25specifically designated for this purpose by the election   SB2239- 5 -LRB104 09172 SPS 19228 b1authority. Grace period registration and changes of address 2shall also be conducted for eligible residents in connection 3with voting at facilities under Section 19-12.2 of this Code. 4The election authority shall register that individual, or 5change a registered voter's address, in the same manner as 6otherwise provided by this Article for registration and change 7of address.8    If a voter who registers or changes address during this 9grace period wishes to vote at the election or primary 10occurring during the grace period, he or she must do so by 11grace period voting. The election authority shall offer 12in-person grace period voting at his or her office, any 13permanent polling place established under Section 19A-10, and 14at any other early voting site beginning 15 days prior to the 15election, at a polling place on election day, where grace 16period registration is required by this Section; and may offer 17in-person grace period voting at additional hours and 18locations specifically designated for the purpose of grace 19period voting by the election authority. The election 20authority may allow grace period voting by mail only if the 21election authority has no ballots prepared at the authority's 22office. Grace period voting shall be in a manner substantially 23similar to voting under Article 19A.24    Within one day after a voter casts a grace period ballot, 25or within one day after the ballot is received by the election 26authority if the election authority allows grace period voting   SB2239- 6 -LRB104 09172 SPS 19228 b1by mail, the election authority shall transmit by electronic 2means pursuant to a process established by the State Board of 3Elections the voter's name, street address, e-mail address, 4and precinct, ward, township, and district numbers, as the 5case may be, to the State Board of Elections, which shall 6maintain those names and that information in an electronic 7format on its website, arranged by county and accessible to 8State and local political committees. The name of each person 9issued a grace period ballot shall also be placed on the 10appropriate precinct list of persons to whom vote by mail and 11early ballots have been issued, for use as provided in 12Sections 17-9 and 18-5.13    A person who casts a grace period ballot shall not be 14permitted to revoke that ballot and vote another ballot with 15respect to that primary or election. Ballots cast by persons 16who register or change address during the grace period at a 17location other than their designated polling place on election 18day must be transmitted to and counted at the election 19authority's central ballot counting location and shall not be 20transmitted to and counted at precinct polling places. The 21grace period ballots determined to be valid shall be added to 22the vote totals for the precincts for which they were cast in 23the order in which the ballots were opened. 24    If a person registers to vote on the day of the election 25under this Section, the election authority shall only allow 26that person to vote a provisional ballot as described in   SB2239- 7 -LRB104 09172 SPS 19228 b1Section 18A-5.2    In counties with a population of less than 100,000 that do 3not have electronic poll books, the election authority may opt 4out of registration in the polling place if the election 5authority establishes grace period registration and voting at 6other sites on election day at the following sites: (i) the 7election authority's main office and (ii) a polling place in 8each municipality where 20% or more of the county's residents 9reside if the election authority's main office is not located 10in that municipality. The election authority may establish 11other grace period registration and voting sites on election 12day provided that the election authority has met the notice 13requirements of Section 19A-25 for permanent and temporary 14early voting sites.15(Source: P.A. 100-442, eff. 8-25-17.) 16    (10 ILCS 5/6-100)17    Sec. 6-100. Grace period. Notwithstanding any other 18provision of this Code to the contrary, each election 19authority shall establish procedures for the registration of 20voters and for change of address during the period from the 21close of registration for an election until and including the 22day of the election. During this grace period, an unregistered 23qualified elector may register to vote, and a registered voter 24may submit a change of address form, in person in the office of 25the election authority, at a permanent polling place   SB2239- 8 -LRB104 09172 SPS 19228 b1established under Section 19A-10, at any other early voting 2site beginning 15 days prior to the election, at a polling 3place on election day, or at a voter registration location 4specifically designated for this purpose by the election 5authority. Grace period registration and changes of address 6shall also be conducted for eligible residents in connection 7with voting at facilities under Section 19-12.2 of this Code. 8The election authority shall register that individual, or 9change a registered voter's address, in the same manner as 10otherwise provided by this Article for registration and change 11of address.12    If a voter who registers or changes address during this 13grace period wishes to vote at the election or primary 14occurring during the grace period. The election authority 15shall offer in-person grace period voting at the authority's 16office, any permanent polling place established under Section 1719A-10, and at any other early voting site beginning 15 days 18prior to the election, at a polling place on election day, 19where grace period registration is required by this Section; 20and may offer in-person grace period voting at additional 21hours and locations specifically designated for the purpose of 22grace period voting by the election authority. The election 23authority may allow grace period voting by mail only if the 24election authority has no ballots prepared at the authority's 25office. Grace period voting shall be in a manner substantially 26similar to voting under Article 19A.  SB2239- 9 -LRB104 09172 SPS 19228 b1    Within one day after a voter casts a grace period ballot, 2or within one day after the ballot is received by the election 3authority if the election authority allows grace period voting 4by mail, the election authority shall transmit by electronic 5means pursuant to a process established by the State Board of 6Elections the voter's name, street address, e-mail address, 7and precinct, ward, township, and district numbers, as the 8case may be, to the State Board of Elections, which shall 9maintain those names and that information in an electronic 10format on its website, arranged by county and accessible to 11State and local political committees. The name of each person 12issued a grace period ballot shall also be placed on the 13appropriate precinct list of persons to whom vote by mail and 14early ballots have been issued, for use as provided in 15Sections 17-9 and 18-5.16    A person who casts a grace period ballot shall not be 17permitted to revoke that ballot and vote another ballot with 18respect to that primary or election. Ballots cast by persons 19who register or change address during the grace period at a 20location other than their designated polling place on election 21day must be transmitted to and counted at the election 22authority's central ballot counting location and shall not be 23transmitted to and counted at precinct polling places. The 24grace period ballots determined to be valid shall be added to 25the vote totals for the precincts for which they were cast in 26the order in which the ballots were opened.  SB2239- 10 -LRB104 09172 SPS 19228 b1    If a person registers to vote on the day of the election 2under this Section, the election authority shall only allow 3that person to vote a provisional ballot as described in 4Section 18A-5.5    In counties with a population of less than 100,000 that do 6not have electronic poll books, the election authority may opt 7out of registration in the polling place if the election 8authority establishes grace period registration and voting at 9other sites on election day at the following sites: (i) the 10election authority's main office and (ii) a polling place in 11each municipality where 20% or more of the county's residents 12reside if the election authority's main office is not located 13in that municipality. The election authority may establish 14other grace period registration and voting sites on election 15day provided that the election authority has met the notice 16requirements of Section 19A-25 for permanent and temporary 17early voting sites.18(Source: P.A. 100-442, eff. 8-25-17.) 19    (10 ILCS 5/18A-5)20    Sec. 18A-5. Provisional voting; general provisions. 21    (a) A person who claims to be a registered voter is 22entitled to cast a provisional ballot under the following 23circumstances:24        (1) The person's name does not appear on the official 25    list of eligible voters for the precinct in which the   SB2239- 11 -LRB104 09172 SPS 19228 b1    person seeks to vote and the person has refused an 2    opportunity to register at the polling location or another 3    grace period registration site. If the person chooses to 4    register to vote on the day of the election, the person 5    shall only be allowed to cast a provisional ballot, and 6    the election authority shall mail to the provisional voter 7    a voter registration application to the address listed on 8    the affidavit described in paragraph (2). The official 9    list is the centralized statewide voter registration list 10    established and maintained in accordance with Section 11    1A-25;12        (2) The person's voting status has been challenged by 13    an election judge, a pollwatcher, or any legal voter and 14    that challenge has been sustained by a majority of the 15    election judges;16        (3) A federal or State court order extends the time 17    for closing the polls beyond the time period established 18    by State law and the person votes during the extended time 19    period;20        (4) The voter registered to vote by mail and is 21    required by law to present identification when voting 22    either in person or by early voting ballot, but fails to do 23    so; 24        (5) The voter's name appears on the list of voters who 25    voted during the early voting period, but the voter claims 26    not to have voted during the early voting period;   SB2239- 12 -LRB104 09172 SPS 19228 b1        (6) The voter received a vote by mail ballot but did 2    not return the vote by mail ballot to the election 3    authority; or 4        (7) The voter attempted to register to vote on 5    election day, but failed to provide the necessary 6    documentation. 7    (b) The procedure for obtaining and casting a provisional 8ballot at the polling place shall be as follows:9        (1) After first verifying through an examination of 10    the precinct register that the person's address is within 11    the precinct boundaries, an election judge at the polling 12    place shall notify a person who is entitled to cast a 13    provisional ballot pursuant to subsection (a) that he or 14    she may cast a provisional ballot in that election. An 15    election judge must accept any information provided by a 16    person who casts a provisional ballot that the person 17    believes supports his or her claim that he or she is a duly 18    registered voter and qualified to vote in the election. 19    However, if the person's residence address is outside the 20    precinct boundaries, the election judge shall inform the 21    person of that fact, give the person the appropriate 22    telephone number of the election authority in order to 23    locate the polling place assigned to serve that address, 24    and instruct the person to go to the proper polling place 25    to vote. 26        (2) The person shall execute a written form provided   SB2239- 13 -LRB104 09172 SPS 19228 b1    by the election judge that shall state or contain all of 2    the following that is available:3             (i) an affidavit stating the following:4                State of Illinois, County of ................, 5            Township ............., Precinct ........, Ward 6            ........, I, ......................., do solemnly 7            swear (or affirm) that: I am a citizen of the 8            United States; I am 18 years of age or older; I 9            have resided in this State and in this precinct 10            for 30 days preceding this election; I have not 11            voted in this election; I am a duly registered 12            voter in every respect; and I am eligible to vote 13            in this election. Signature ...... Printed Name of 14            Voter ....... Printed Residence Address of Voter 15            ...... City ...... State .... Zip Code ..... 16            Telephone Number ...... Date of Birth ....... and 17            Illinois Driver's License Number ....... or Last 4 18            digits of Social Security Number ...... or State 19            Identification Card Number issued to you by the 20            Illinois Secretary of State ........21            (ii) A box for the election judge to check one of 22        the reasons why the person was given a provisional 23        ballot under subsection (a) of this Section.24            (iii) An area for the election judge to affix his 25        or her signature and to set forth any facts that 26        support or oppose the allegation that the person is   SB2239- 14 -LRB104 09172 SPS 19228 b1        not qualified to vote in the precinct in which the 2        person is seeking to vote.3        The written affidavit form described in this 4    subsection (b)(2) must be printed on a multi-part form 5    prescribed by the county clerk or board of election 6    commissioners, as the case may be.7        (3) After the person executes the portion of the 8    written affidavit described in subsection (b)(2)(i) of 9    this Section, the election judge shall complete the 10    portion of the written affidavit described in subsection 11    (b)(2)(iii) and (b)(2)(iv).12        (4) The election judge shall give a copy of the 13    completed written affidavit to the person. The election 14    judge shall place the original written affidavit in a 15    self-adhesive clear plastic packing list envelope that 16    must be attached to a separate envelope marked as a 17    "provisional ballot envelope". The election judge shall 18    also place any information provided by the person who 19    casts a provisional ballot in the clear plastic packing 20    list envelope. Each county clerk or board of election 21    commissioners, as the case may be, must design, obtain or 22    procure self-adhesive clear plastic packing list envelopes 23    and provisional ballot envelopes that are suitable for 24    implementing this subsection (b)(4) of this Section.25        (5) The election judge shall provide the person with a 26    provisional ballot, written instructions for casting a   SB2239- 15 -LRB104 09172 SPS 19228 b1    provisional ballot, and the provisional ballot envelope 2    with the clear plastic packing list envelope affixed to 3    it, which contains the person's original written affidavit 4    and, if any, information provided by the provisional voter 5    to support his or her claim that he or she is a duly 6    registered voter. An election judge must also give the 7    person written information that states that any person who 8    casts a provisional ballot shall be able to ascertain, 9    pursuant to guidelines established by the State Board of 10    Elections, whether the provisional vote was counted in the 11    official canvass of votes for that election and, if the 12    provisional vote was not counted, the reason that the vote 13    was not counted.14        (6) After the person has completed marking his or her 15    provisional ballot, he or she shall place the marked 16    ballot inside of the provisional ballot envelope, close 17    and seal the envelope, and return the envelope to an 18    election judge, who shall then deposit the sealed 19    provisional ballot envelope into a securable container 20    separately identified and utilized for containing sealed 21    provisional ballot envelopes. Ballots that are provisional 22    because they are cast after 7:00 p.m. by court order shall 23    be kept separate from other provisional ballots. Upon the 24    closing of the polls, the securable container shall be 25    sealed with filament tape provided for that purpose, which 26    shall be wrapped around the box lengthwise and crosswise,   SB2239- 16 -LRB104 09172 SPS 19228 b1    at least twice each way, and each of the election judges 2    shall sign the seal.3    (c) Instead of the affidavit form described in subsection 4(b), the county clerk or board of election commissioners, as 5the case may be, may design and use a multi-part affidavit form 6that is imprinted upon or attached to the provisional ballot 7envelope described in subsection (b). If a county clerk or 8board of election commissioners elects to design and use its 9own multi-part affidavit form, then the county clerk or board 10of election commissioners shall establish a mechanism for 11accepting any information the provisional voter has supplied 12to the election judge to support his or her claim that he or 13she is a duly registered voter. In all other respects, a county 14clerk or board of election commissioners shall establish 15procedures consistent with subsection (b).16    (d) The county clerk or board of election commissioners, 17as the case may be, shall use the completed affidavit form 18described in subsection (b) to update the person's voter 19registration information in the State voter registration 20database and voter registration database of the county clerk 21or board of election commissioners, as the case may be. If a 22person is later determined not to be a registered voter based 23on Section 18A-15 of this Code, then the affidavit shall be 24processed by the county clerk or board of election 25commissioners, as the case may be, as a voter registration 26application.  SB2239- 17 -LRB104 09172 SPS 19228 b1(Source: P.A. 100-201, eff. 8-18-17.) 2    (10 ILCS 5/18A-15)3    Sec. 18A-15. Validating and counting provisional ballots. 4    (a) The county clerk or board of election commissioners 5shall complete the validation and counting of provisional 6ballots within 14 calendar days of the day of the election. The 7county clerk or board of election commissioners shall have 7 8calendar days from the completion of the validation and 9counting of provisional ballots to conduct its final canvass. 10The State Board of Elections shall complete within 31 calendar 11days of the election or sooner if all the returns are received, 12its final canvass of the vote for all public offices.13    (b) If a county clerk or board of election commissioners 14determines that all of the following apply, then a provisional 15ballot is valid and shall be counted as a vote:16        (1) the provisional voter cast the provisional ballot 17    in the correct precinct based on the address provided by 18    the provisional voter. The provisional voter's affidavit 19    shall serve as a change of address request by that voter 20    for registration purposes for the next ensuing election if 21    it bears an address different from that in the records of 22    the election authority. Votes for federal and statewide 23    offices on a provisional ballot cast in the incorrect 24    precinct that meet the other requirements of this 25    subsection shall be valid and counted in accordance with   SB2239- 18 -LRB104 09172 SPS 19228 b1    this Article. As used in this item, "federal office" is 2    defined as provided in Section 20-1 and "statewide office" 3    means the Governor, Attorney General, Secretary of State, 4    Comptroller, and Treasurer. Votes for General Assembly, 5    countywide, citywide, or township office on a provisional 6    ballot cast in the incorrect precinct but in the correct 7    legislative district, representative district, county, 8    municipality, or township, as the case may be, shall be 9    valid and counted in accordance with this Article. As used 10    in this item, "citywide office" means an office elected by 11    the electors of an entire municipality. As used in this 12    item, "township office" means an office elected by the 13    electors of an entire township;14        (2) the affidavit executed by the provisional voter 15    pursuant to subsection (b)(2) of Section 18A-5 contains, 16    at a minimum, the provisional voter's first and last name, 17    house number and street name, and signature or mark;18        (3) except as permitted by item (5) of subsection (b) 19    of this Section, the provisional voter is a registered 20    voter based on information available to the county clerk 21    or board of election commissioners provided by or obtained 22    from any of the following:23            i. the provisional voter;24            ii. an election judge;25            iii. the statewide voter registration database 26        maintained by the State Board of Elections;  SB2239- 19 -LRB104 09172 SPS 19228 b1            iv. the records of the county clerk or board of 2        election commissioners' database; or3            v. the records of the Secretary of State; and4        (4) for a provisional ballot cast under item (6) of 5    subsection (a) of Section 18A-5, the voter did not vote by 6    mail ballot in the election at which the provisional 7    ballot was cast; or 8        (5) for a provisional ballot cast under item (7) of 9    subsection (a) of Section 18A-5, the voter provides the 10    election authority with the necessary documentation within 11    7 days of election day; or . 12        (6) for a provisional ballot cast under paragraph (1) 13    of subsection (a) of Section 18A-5, the voter completes 14    and returns the voter registration application that the 15    election authority mailed to the voter upon casting a 16    provisional ballot within 14 days after the day of the 17    election.18    (c) With respect to subsection (b)(3) of this Section, the 19county clerk or board of election commissioners shall 20investigate and record whether or not the specified 21information is available from each of the 5 identified 22sources. If the information is available from one or more of 23the identified sources, then the county clerk or board of 24election commissioners shall seek to obtain the information 25from each of those sources until satisfied, with information 26from at least one of those sources, that the provisional voter   SB2239- 20 -LRB104 09172 SPS 19228 b1is registered and entitled to vote. The county clerk or board 2of election commissioners shall use any information it obtains 3as the basis for determining the voter registration status of 4the provisional voter. If a conflict exists among the 5information available to the county clerk or board of election 6commissioners as to the registration status of the provisional 7voter, then the county clerk or board of election 8commissioners shall make a determination based on the totality 9of the circumstances. In a case where the above information 10equally supports or opposes the registration status of the 11voter, the county clerk or board of election commissioners 12shall decide in favor of the provisional voter as being duly 13registered to vote. If the statewide voter registration 14database maintained by the State Board of Elections indicates 15that the provisional voter is registered to vote, but the 16county clerk's or board of election commissioners' voter 17registration database indicates that the provisional voter is 18not registered to vote, then the information found in the 19statewide voter registration database shall control the matter 20and the provisional voter shall be deemed to be registered to 21vote. If the records of the county clerk or board of election 22commissioners indicates that the provisional voter is 23registered to vote, but the statewide voter registration 24database maintained by the State Board of Elections indicates 25that the provisional voter is not registered to vote, then the 26information found in the records of the county clerk or board   SB2239- 21 -LRB104 09172 SPS 19228 b1of election commissioners shall control the matter and the 2provisional voter shall be deemed to be registered to vote. If 3the provisional voter's signature on his or her provisional 4ballot request varies from the signature on an otherwise valid 5registration application solely because of the substitution of 6initials for the first or middle name, the election authority 7may not reject the provisional ballot.8    (d) In validating the registration status of a person 9casting a provisional ballot, the county clerk or board of 10election commissioners shall not require a provisional voter 11to complete any form other than the affidavit executed by the 12provisional voter under subsection (b)(2) of Section 18A-5. In 13addition, the county clerk or board of election commissioners 14shall not require all provisional voters or any particular 15class or group of provisional voters to appear personally 16before the county clerk or board of election commissioners or 17as a matter of policy require provisional voters to submit 18additional information to verify or otherwise support the 19information already submitted by the provisional voter. Within 202 calendar days after the election, the election authority 21shall transmit by electronic means pursuant to a process 22established by the State Board of Elections the name, street 23address, e-mail address, and precinct, ward, township, and 24district numbers, as the case may be, of each person casting a 25provisional ballot to the State Board of Elections, which 26shall maintain those names and that information in an   SB2239- 22 -LRB104 09172 SPS 19228 b1electronic format on its website, arranged by county and 2accessible to State and local political committees. The 3provisional voter may, within 7 calendar days after the 4election, submit additional information to the county clerk or 5board of election commissioners. This information must be 6received by the county clerk or board of election 7commissioners within the 7-calendar-day period.8    (e) If the county clerk or board of election commissioners 9determines that subsection (b)(1), (b)(2), or (b)(3) does not 10apply, then the provisional ballot is not valid and may not be 11counted. The provisional ballot envelope containing the ballot 12cast by the provisional voter may not be opened. The county 13clerk or board of election commissioners shall write on the 14provisional ballot envelope the following: "Provisional ballot 15determined invalid.".16    (f) If the county clerk or board of election commissioners 17determines that a provisional ballot is valid under this 18Section, then the provisional ballot envelope shall be opened. 19The outside of each provisional ballot envelope shall also be 20marked to identify the precinct and the date of the election.21    (g) Provisional ballots determined to be valid shall be 22counted at the election authority's central ballot counting 23location and shall not be counted in precincts. The 24provisional ballots determined to be valid shall be added to 25the vote totals for the precincts from which they were cast in 26the order in which the ballots were opened. The validation and   SB2239- 23 -LRB104 09172 SPS 19228 b1counting of provisional ballots shall be subject to the 2provisions of this Code that apply to pollwatchers. If the 3provisional ballots are a ballot of a punch card voting 4system, then the provisional ballot shall be counted in a 5manner consistent with Article 24A. If the provisional ballots 6are a ballot of optical scan or other type of approved 7electronic voting system, then the provisional ballots shall 8be counted in a manner consistent with Article 24B.9    (h) As soon as the ballots have been counted, the election 10judges or election officials shall, in the presence of the 11county clerk or board of election commissioners, place each of 12the following items in a separate envelope or bag: (1) all 13provisional ballots, voted or spoiled; (2) all provisional 14ballot envelopes of provisional ballots voted or spoiled; and 15(3) all executed affidavits of the provisional ballots voted 16or spoiled. All provisional ballot envelopes for provisional 17voters who have been determined not to be registered to vote 18shall remain sealed. The county clerk or board of election 19commissioners shall treat the provisional ballot envelope 20containing the written affidavit as a voter registration 21application for that person for the next election and process 22that application. The election judges or election officials 23shall then securely seal each envelope or bag, initial the 24envelope or bag, and plainly mark on the outside of the 25envelope or bag in ink the precinct in which the provisional 26ballots were cast. The election judges or election officials   SB2239- 24 -LRB104 09172 SPS 19228 b1shall then place each sealed envelope or bag into a box, secure 2and seal it in the same manner as described in item (6) of 3subsection (b) of Section 18A-5. Each election judge or 4election official shall take and subscribe an oath before the 5county clerk or board of election commissioners that the 6election judge or election official securely kept the ballots 7and papers in the box, did not permit any person to open the 8box or otherwise touch or tamper with the ballots and papers in 9the box, and has no knowledge of any other person opening the 10box. For purposes of this Section, the term "election 11official" means the county clerk, a member of the board of 12election commissioners, as the case may be, and their 13respective employees.14(Source: P.A. 97-766, eff. 7-6-12; 98-115, eff. 7-29-13; 1598-691, eff. 7-1-14; 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15.)